District of Columbia statutes.
45-603

Gender rule of construction.

Unless the Council of the District of Columbia specifically provides that this section shall be inapplicable to a particular act or section, all the words thereof importing 1 gender include and apply to the other gender as well.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1189, ch. 854
June 4, 1982, D.C. Law 4-111, § 2(a), 29 DCR 1684

History

Acts and resolutions of Council, rules of construction, see § 1-301.45 et seq.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 49-203.
1973 Ed., § 49-203.

Prior Codifications